Vermont, session 2025-2026, H71.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 18 V.S.A. chapter 226 is added to read:
CHAPTER 226. TRANSACTION OVERSIGHT AND CLINICAL
DECISION MAKING
Subchapter 1. General Provisions
§ 9521. DEFINITIONS
As used in this chapter:
(1) “Acquisition” means the direct or indirect purchase in any manner,
including by lease, transfer, exchange, option, receipt of a conveyance,
creation of a joint venture, or any other manner of purchase, such as by a
health care system, private equity group, hedge fund, publicly traded company,
real estate investment trust, management services organization, insurance
company, or a subsidiary of any of these entities, of a material amount of the
assets or operations of a health care entity.
(2) “Affiliate” means:
(A) a person who directly, indirectly, or through one or more
intermediaries, controls, is controlled by, or is under common control or
ownership of another person;
(B) a person whose business is operated under a lease, management,
or operating agreement by another entity, or a person substantially all of whose
VT LEG #378935 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.71
2025 Page 3 of 45
property is operated under a management or operating agreement with that
other entity;
(C) an entity that operates the business or substantially all of the
property of another entity under a lease, management, or operating agreement;
or
(D) any out-of-state operations or corporate affiliate of an affiliate, as
defined in subdivision (A), (B), or (C) of this subdivision (2), including
significant equity investors, health care real estate investment trusts, and
management services organizations.
(3) “Change of control” means an arrangement in which any other
person acquires direct or indirect control over the operations of a health care
entity in whole or in substantial part. As used in this subdivision,
“arrangement” includes any agreement, association, partnership, joint venture,
management services agreement, professional services agreement, health care
staffing company agreement, or other arrangement that results in a change of
governance or control of a health care entity or a department, subdivision, or
subsidiary of a health care entity.
(4) “Control,” including “controlling,” “controlled by,” and “under
common control with,” means the direct or indirect power through ownership,
contractual agreement, or otherwise, to:
VT LEG #378935 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.71
2025 Page 4 of 45
(A) vote more than 10 percent of any class of voting shares of a
health care entity; or
(B) direct the actions or policies of the specified entity.
(5) “Health care entity” means a health care provider, health care
facility, provider organization, pharmacy benefit manager as defined in section
3602 of this title, or health insurer as defined in section 9402 of this title that
offers a health insurance plan in this State.
(6) “Health care facility” has the same meaning as in section 9432 of
this title.
(7) “Health care provider” has the same meaning as in section 9402 of
this title.
(8) “Health care services” has the same meaning as in section 9481 of
this title and includes all of the following:
(A) inpatient, outpatient, habilitative, rehabilitative, dental, palliative,
therapeutic, supportive, nursing home, home health, mental health, and
substance use disorder services provided by a health care entity;
(B) pharmacy services, including drugs, devices, and medical
supplies;
(C) performance of functions to refer, arrange, and coordinate care;
(D) durable medical equipment, diagnostic equivalent, surgical
devices, and infusion equipment; and
VT LEG #378935 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.71
2025 Page 5 of 45
(E) technology associated with providing the services and equipment
set forth in subdivisions (A)–(D) of this subdivision (8), such as telehealth,
electronic health records, software, claims processing, and utilization systems.
(9) “Health care staffing company” means a person engaged in the
business of providing or procuring health care personnel for temporary
employment or contracting by a health care facility, but does not include an
individual who independently provides the individual’s own services on a
temporary basis to health care facilities as an employee or contractor.
(10) “Licensee” means an individual licensed in this State as a physician
pursuant to 26 V.S.A. chapter 23 or 33, as an advanced practice registered
nurse pursuant to 26 V.S.A. chapter 28, or as a physician assistant pursuant to
26 V.S.A. chapter 31 who is authorized to diagnose and treat in the applicable
clinical setting.
(11) “Management services organization” means any organization or
entity that contracts with a health care provider or provider organization to
perform management or administrative services relating to, supporting, or
facilitating the provision of health care services.
(12)(A) “Material change transaction” means any of the following,
occurring during a single transaction or in a series of related transactions
involving a health care entity within the State that has total assets, annual
VT LEG #378935 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.71
2025 Page 6 of 45
revenues, or anticipated annual revenues for new entities, of at least
$1,000,000.00, including both in-state and out-of-state assets and revenues:
(i) a corporate merger including one or more health care entities;
(ii) an acquisition of one or more health care entities, including
insolvent health care entities;
(iii) any affiliation, arrangement, or contract that results in a
change of control for a health care entity;
(iv) the formation of a partnership, joint venture, accountable care
organization, parent organization, or management services organization for the
purpose of administering contracts with health insurers, third-party
administrators, pharmacy benefit managers, or health care providers;
(v) a sale, purchase, lease, affiliation, or transfer of control of a
board of directors or governing body of a health care entity;
(vi) a real estate sale or lease agreement involving a material
amount of assets of a health care entity; or
(vii) the closure of a health care facility, or the closure,
discontinuance, or significant reduction of any essential health service
provided by a health care entity that is either a provider organization or health
care facility or any new contracts or clinical or contractual affiliations that will
eliminate or significantly reduce essential services.
VT LEG #378935 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.71
2025 Page 7 of 45
(B) “Material change transaction” does not include any of the
following:
(i) a clinical affiliation of health care entities formed solely for the
purpose of collaborating on clinical trials;
(ii) graduate medical education programs;
(iii) the mere offer of employment to, or hiring of, an individual
health care provider; or
(iv) situations in which the health care entity directly, or indirectly
through one or more intermediaries, already controls, is controlled by, or is
under common control with, all other parties to the transaction, such as a
corporate restructuring.
(13) “Medical practice” means a corporate entity or partnership
organized for the purpose of practicing medicine and permitted to practice
medicine in this State, including partnerships, professional corporations,
limited liability companies, and limited liability partnerships.
(14) “Noncompetition agreement” means a written agreement between a
licensee and another person in which the licensee agrees that the licensee,
either alone or as an employee, associate, or affiliate of a third person, will not
compete with the other person in providing products, processes, or services
that are similar to the other person’s products, processes, or services for a
period of time or within a specified geographic area after termination of
VT LEG #378935 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.71
2025 Page 8 of 45
employment or termination of a contract under which the licensee supplied
goods to or performed services for the other person.
(15) “Nondisclosure agreement” means a written agreement under the
terms of which a licensee must refrain from disclosing partially, fully, directly,
or indirectly to any person, other than another party to the written agreement or
to a person specified in the agreement as a third-party beneficiary of the
agreement:
(A) a policy or practice that a party to the agreement required the
licensee to use in patient care, other than individually identifiable health
information that the licensee must not disclose under the Health Insurance
Portability and Accountability Act of 1996, Pub. L. No. 104-191;
(B) a policy, practice, or other information about or associated with
the licensee’s employment, conditions of employment, or rate or amount of
pay or other compensation; or
(C) any other information the licensee possesses or to which the
licensee has access by reason of the licensee’s employment by, or provision of
services for or on behalf of, a party to the agreement, other than information
that is subject to protection under applicable law as a trade secret of, or
otherwise proprietary to, another party to the agreement or to a person
specified in the agreement as a third-party beneficiary of the agreement.
VT LEG #378935 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.71
2025 Page 9 of 45
(16) “Nondisparagement agreement” means a written agreement under
which a licensee must refrain from making to a third party a statement about
another party to the agreement or about another person specified in the
agreement as a third-party beneficiary of the agreement, the effect of which
causes or threatens to cause harm to the other party’s or person’s reputation,
business relations, or other economic interests.
(17) “Ownership or investment interest” means any of the following:
(A) direct or indirect possession of equity in the capital, stock, or
profits totaling more than five percent of an entity;
(B) interest held by an investor or group of investors who engage in
the raising or returning of capital and who invest, develop, or dispose of
specified assets; or
(C) interest held by a pool of funds by investors, including a pool of
funds managed or controlled by private limited partnerships, if those investors
or the management of that pool or private limited partnership employs
investment strategies of any kind to earn a return on that pool of funds.
(18) “Private equity fund” means a publicly traded or nonpublicly traded
company that collects capital investments from individuals or entities and
purchases a direct or indirect ownership share or controlling interest of a health
care entity.
VT LEG #378935 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.71
2025 Page 10 of 45
(19) “Provider organization” means any corporation, partnership,
business trust, association, or organized group of persons that is in the business
of health care delivery or management, whether incorporated or not, that
represents one or more health care providers in contracting with health insurers
for payment for health care services. The term includes physician
organizations, physician-hospital organizations, independent practice
associations, provider networks, accountable care organizations, management
services organizations, and any other organization that contracts with health
insurers for payment for health care services.
(20) “Significant equity investor” means:
(A) any private equity fund with a direct or indirect ownership or
investment interest in a health care facility;
(B) an investor, group of investors, or other entity with a direct or
indirect possession of equity in the capital, stock, or profits totaling more than
10 percent of a provider or provider organization; or
(C) any private equity fund, investor, group of investors, or other
entity with a direct or indirect controlling interest in a health care entity or that
operates the business or substantially all the property of a health care entity
under a lease, management, or operating agreement.
VT LEG #378935 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.71
2025 Page 11 of 45
Subchapter 2. Review of Proposed Health Care Facility Transactions
§ 9525. NOTICE
(a) Notice required. Any health care entity shall, prior to consummating
any material change transaction, submit written notice to the Green Mountain
Care Board and the Attorney General not fewer than 180 days before the date
of the proposed material change transaction. Notice shall be considered
received on the first business day after the Green Mountain Care Board
determines that notice is complete.
(b) Contents of notice. Written notice shall include and contain the
information the Green Mountain Care Board and the Attorney General
determine is required. The health care entity may include any additional
information supporting the written notice of the material change transaction.
Notice is complete when the Green Mountain Care Board and the Attorney
General determine that all required information has been received.
(c) Confidentiality.
(1) All information provided by the submitter as part of the notice shall
be available for public inspection and copying under the Public Records Act
unless the submitter designates specific documents or information as
confidential when submitting the notice and the Green Mountain Care Board
and the Attorney General concur with the designation in accordance with a
process established by the Green Mountain Care Board by rule. Information
VT LEG #378935 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.71
2025 Page 12 of 45
that is otherwise publicly available, or that has not been confidentially
maintained by the source, shall be considered public information.
(2) The Green Mountain Care Board and the Attorney General shall
maintain the confidentiality of all confidential information that is obtained in
relation to a material change transaction, except that the Green Mountain Care
Board and the Attorney General may share confidential information with each
other to carry out their respective authorities under this chapter and may
disclose any information to an expert or consultant under contract with the
Green Mountain Care Board or the Attorney General, provided that the expert
or consultant is bound by the same confidentiality requirements as the Board
and the Attorney General.
(3) Any information and documents determined to be confidential
pursuant to subdivision (1) of this subsection shall be exempt from public
inspection and copying under the Public Records Act and shall be kept
confidential.
(d) Public notice. Within 10 days after receiving written notice of a
material change transaction, the Green Mountain Care Board shall post on a
publicly available website information about the material change transaction,
including:
(1) a summary of the proposed transaction, including the identity of the
parties to the transaction;
VT LEG #378935 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.71
2025 Page 13 of 45
(2) an explanation of the groups or individuals likely to be impacted by
the transaction;
(3) information about services currently provided by the health care
entity, commitments by the health care entity to continue such services, and
any services that will be reduced or eliminated;
(4) details about any public hearings regarding the proposed transaction;
(5) how to submit public comments regarding the proposed transaction;
and
(6) any other information from the notice and other materials submitted
by the health care entity that the Green Mountain Care Board or the Attorney
General determines would be in the public interest, except for materials
designated confidential under subsection (c) of this section.
§ 9526. PRELIMINARY REVIEW
(a) Within 30 days following receipt of a notice of material change
transaction as set forth in section 9525 of this chapter, and unless otherwise
provided in subsection (b) of this section, the Green Mountain Care Board, in
consultation with the Attorney General, shall do one of the following:
(1) Approve the material change transaction and notify the health care
entity in writing that a comprehensive review is not required for the material
change transaction.
VT LEG #378935 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.71
2025 Page 14 of 45
(2) Approve the material change transaction subject to conditions set by
the Green Mountain Care Board and notify the health care entity in writing of
the conditions under which the transaction may be completed.
(3) Notify the health care entity in writing that the transaction is subject
to a comprehensive review. The Green Mountain Care Board or the Attorney
General, or both, may request additional information necessary to perform a
comprehensive review under section 9527 of this chapter.
(b)(1) A comprehensive review shall be required when any of the following
applies to the material change transaction:
(A) the transaction will result in the transfer of assets valued above
$1,000,000.00;
(B) the transaction occurs in a highly consolidated market for any
line of services offered by any party to the material change transaction;
(C) the transaction will cause a significant change in market share,
such that any resulting health care entity possesses market power upon
completion;
(D) the transaction will otherwise lessen competition, including
effects of vertical or cross-market transactions among different product or
geographic markets;
(E) either party to the material change transaction possesses market
power prior to the transaction; or
VT LEG #378935 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.71
2025 Page 15 of 45
(F) the Green Mountain Care Board or the Attorney General, or both,
at their sole discretion, determine that the material change transaction is likely
to have a material impact on the cost, quality, equity, or access to health care
services in any region in the state.
(2) For purposes of this subsection, “market power” means possessing
30 percent or more of the market share in any line of service in the relevant
geographic area or under other criteria that the Green Mountain Care Board
may define by rule.
(c) Nothing in this section shall be deemed to limit or infringe upon the
existing authority of any State agency, including the Green Mountain Care
Board, the Department of Financial Regulation, the Department of Health, or
the Attorney General, to review any transactions.
§ 9527. COMPREHENSIVE REVIEW PROCESS
(a) Not later than 90 days after determining that a transaction is subject to a
comprehensive review, the Green Mountain Care Board shall conduct one or
more public hearings or public meetings, one of which shall be in the county in
which the health care entity is located, to hear comments from interested
parties.
(b) The Green Mountain Care Board shall conduct a cost and market
impact review of the proposed transaction in consultation with the Attorney
General. The cost and market impact review shall examine factors relating to
VT LEG #378935 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.71
2025 Page 16 of 45
the proposed transaction, the transacting parties, and their relative market
position, including:
(1) the market share of each transacting party and the likely effects of
the transaction on competition;
(2) any previous transaction involving any transacting party, including
acquisitions of or mergers with similar health care providers, whether or not in
the same state;
(3) the prices charged by any of the transacting parties for services,
including their relative prices compared to others’ prices for the same services
in the same geographic area;
(4) the quality of the services provided by any health care provider or
providers that are party to the transaction, including patient experience;
(5) the cost and cost trends of the transacting entities in comparison to
total health care expenditures statewide;
(6) the availability and accessibility of services similar to those
provided, or proposed to be provided, through any provider or provider
organization that is party to the transaction within its primary service areas and
dispersed service areas;
(7) the impact of the material change transaction on competing options
for the delivery of health care services within the transacting parties’ primary
service areas and dispersed service areas;
VT LEG #378935 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.71
2025 Page 17 of 45
(8) the role of the transacting parties in serving at-risk, underserved, and
government payer patient populations;
(9) the role of the transacting parties in providing low-margin or
negative-margin services within their primary service areas and dispersed
service areas;
(10) any consumer concerns, including complaints or other allegations
that any provider or provider organization that is party to the transaction has
engaged in any unfair method of competition or any unfair or deceptive act or
practice;
(11) the transaction parties’ compliance with prior conditions and legal
requirements related to competitive conduct, including compliance with
corporate practice of medicine requirements under subchapter 3 of this chapter
and reporting requirements regarding health care entity ownership and control
under subchapter 4 of this chapter;
(12) the impact of the transaction on the clinical workforce, including
wages, staffing levels, supply, patient access, and continuity of patient-care
relationships;
(13) the impact of any real estate sale or lease agreement related to the
transaction on the financial condition of each health care entity that is party to
the transaction and its ability to maintain patient care operations;
VT LEG #378935 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.71
2025 Page 18 of 45
(14) in the case of a proposed closure or discontinuance of a health care
facility or any essential health services, the impact of the closure on health care
access, outcomes, costs, and equity for those in the health care facility’s
service area, and the health care facility’s plan for ensuring equitable access,
quality, affordability, and availability of essential health services within the
service area; and
(15) any other factors that the Green Mountain Care Board or the
Attorney General determines to be in the public interest.
(c)(1)(A) Each party to the proposed transaction shall provide to the Green
Mountain Care Board and the Attorney General:
(i) a copy of the party’s audited financial statements and the
details of all other transactions related to the proposed transaction, such as
investments and loans to organizations in the party’s portfolio, as well as any
other information provided to the party’s investors regarding the proposed
transaction;
(ii) information regarding any and all plans the party has to earn
investor returns, payouts, dividends, or related private payments during the
operation of and upon exit from the ownership of or contract with a health care
provider; and
(iii) a plain language summary of all of the means by which the
party plans to generate profits related to the proposed transaction.
VT LEG #378935 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.71
2025 Page 19 of 45
(B) All materials acquired by the Green Mountain Care Board and
Attorney General pursuant to subdivision (A) of this subdivision (c)(1) shall be
made available to the public except to the extent that a document or other item
would be exempt from public inspection and copying under the Public Records
Act.
(2) The Green Mountain Care Board may request additional information
or documents from the transacting parties necessary to conduct a cost and
market impact review. Failure to respond or insufficient responses to requests
for information by transacting parties may result in the extension of the
deadline for the Green Mountain Care Board to complete the cost and market
impact review, the imposition of conditions for approval, or the disapproval of
the material change transaction.
(3) The Office of the Health Care Advocate shall have the right to
receive copies of all materials related to the proposed transaction and the
comprehensive review and may submit comments for the Board’s
consideration. The Office of the Health Care Advocate shall not further
disclose any confidential or proprietary information provided to the Office
pursuant to this section.
(d) All confidential or otherwise nonpublic information and documents
produced or obtained under this section are exempt from public inspection and
copying under the Public Records Act and shall be kept confidential. The
VT LEG #378935 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.71
2025 Page 20 of 45
Green Mountain Care Board and the Attorney General shall not disclose the
confidential information or documents to any person other than the Office of
the Health Care Advocate without the consent of the party that produced the
confidential information or documents, except that the Green Mountain Care
Board and the Attorney General may disclose any information to any other
State agency and to an expert or consultant under contract with the Green
Mountain Care Board or the Attorney General, or both, to review the proposed
transaction, provided that the State agency, expert, or consultant is bound by
the same confidentiality requirements as the Green Mountain Care Board and
the Attorney General.
(e) The Green Mountain Care Board and the Attorney General may, in their
sole discretion:
(1) contract with, consult, and receive advice from any State agency as
the Green Mountain Care Board or the Attorney General, or both, deems
appropriate; and
(2) contract with experts or consultants to assist in reviewing the
proposed agreement or transaction.
(f)(1) Not more than 120 days after determining that the transaction is
subject to a comprehensive review under this section, the Green Mountain
Care Board shall produce a cost and market impact review report containing
the findings and conclusions of the cost and market impact review, provided
VT LEG #378935 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.71
2025 Page 21 of 45
that the health care entity has complied with the requests for information or
documents pursuant to this section within 21 days following the request or by a
later date set by mutual agreement of the health care entity and the Green
Mountain Care Board or the Attorney General, as applicable. The cost and
market impact review report shall be posted publicly and shall not disclose
confidential information.
(2) The Green Mountain Care Board may adopt rules creating an
expedited process for conducting a cost and market impact review for
transactions resulting in a transfer of assets not to exceed $1,500,000.00 if
there are few competitive concerns or involving a distressed provider in danger
of closing, or both.
(g) The Green Mountain Care Board and the Attorney General shall be
entitled to charge their costs to the transacting parties for all actual, reasonable,
direct costs incurred in reviewing, evaluating, and making the determination
referred to in this section, including administrative costs and the costs of
contracted experts or consultants pursuant to subsection (e) of this section.
§ 9528. APPROVAL AUTHORITY
(a)(1) The Green Mountain Care Board, in consultation with the Attorney
General, shall have discretion to approve, conditionally approve, or disapprove
of any material change transaction for which the Green Mountain Care Board
receives notice under section 9525 of this chapter. Any conditions imposed
VT LEG #378935 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.71
2025 Page 22 of 45
pursuant to this section shall specify a time period for compliance, an
expiration date, or that the condition applies indefinitely.
(2) Notwithstanding subdivision (1) of this subsection, in the case of a
material change transaction involving a health insurer that would be subject to
review and approval by the Department of Financial Regulation, the Green
Mountain Care Board shall make a recommendation to the Department of
Financial Regulation based on the Green Mountain Care Board’s review
whether the transaction should be approved, disapproved, on conditionally
approved.
(b) The Green Mountain Care Board shall inform the health care entity of
its determination within 30 days following receipt of notice under section 9525
of this chapter or, in the case of comprehensive review, within 60 days
following the completion of the cost and market impact review. No proposed
material change transaction shall be completed before the Green Mountain
Care Board has informed the health care entity of its determination.
(c) In making its determination, Green Mountain Care Board, in
consultation with the Attorney General, may consider any factors that the
Board or the Attorney General deems relevant, including:
(1) the likely impact, as described in the cost and market impact review
report where applicable, of the material change transaction on:
(A) health care costs, prices, and affordability;
VT LEG #378935 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.71
2025 Page 23 of 45
(B) the availability or accessibility of health care services to the
affected community;
(C) provider cost trends and containment of total State health care
spending;
(D) access to services in medically underserved areas;
(E) rectifying historical and contemporary factors contributing to a
lack of health equities or access to services;
(F) the functioning and competitiveness of the markets for health care
and health insurance;
(G) the potential effects of the transaction on health outcomes,
quality, access, equity, or workforce, or a combination of these, for residents of
this State; and
(H) the potential loss or change in access to essential services;
(2) whether the material change transaction is contrary to or violates any
applicable law, including State antitrust laws, laws restricting the corporate
practice of medicine, and consumer protection laws;
(3) whether the benefits of the transaction are likely to outweigh the
anticompetitive effects from the transaction; and
(4) whether the transaction is in the public interest and advances the
principles set forth in section 9371 of this title.
VT LEG #378935 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.71
2025 Page 24 of 45
(d) The Green Mountain Care Board shall not approve a material change
transaction if any of the following conditions is met:
(1) the transaction would give a party ownership of the core business
operations of an essential community provider, as defined in 45 C.F.R.
§ 156.235;
(2) the transaction involves financing the acquisition of a health care
entity through the use of debt that will become an obligation of one or more of
the health care entities that are party to the transaction;
(3) the transaction involves issuing dividends or other shareholder
returns financed by debt that will become an obligation of one or more of the
health care entities that are party to the transaction;
(4) the transaction involves entering into any contract or other service or
purchasing arrangement with an affiliated legal entity, except for a contract or
arrangement to provide services or products, or both, that are necessary to
accomplish the legitimate health care purposes of the relevant health care
entity and the contract or arrangement provides for compensation or
reimbursement that is consistent with the fair market value of the services
rendered or products delivered; or
(5) the transaction would result in one or more health care entities that
does not accept, or that places limitations on, patients covered by Medicaid,
original Medicare, or Medicare Advantage.
VT LEG #378935 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.71
2025 Page 25 of 45
(e) Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit or alter any existing
authority of the Attorney General or any other State agency to enforce any
other law, including State or federal antitrust law, or to review transactions
involving nonprofit entities.
§ 9529. POST-TRANSACTION OVERSIGHT
(a) Enforcement by the Office of the Attorney General.
(1) The Attorney General may subpoena any records necessary to
enforce any provisions of this chapter or to investigate suspected violations of
any provisions of this chapter or any conditions imposed by conditional
approval pursuant to section 9528 of this chapter. The Attorney General may
audit the books, documents, records, and data of any entity that is subject to a
conditional approval under section 9528 of this chapter to monitor compliance
with the conditions.
(2)(A) The Attorney General may enforce any requirement of this
chapter and any conditions imposed by a conditional approval pursuant to
section 9528 of this chapter to the fullest extent provided by law, including
damages. In addition to any legal remedies the Attorney General may have,
the Attorney General shall be entitled to specific performance, injunctive
relief, and other equitable remedies a court deems appropriate for any
violations or imminent violation of any requirement of this chapter or breach
of any of the conditions and shall be entitled to recover the Office of the
VT LEG #378935 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.71
2025 Page 26 of 45
Attorney General’s attorney’s fees and costs incurred in remedying each
violation.
(B) In addition to the remedies set forth in subdivision (A) of this
subdivision (a)(2), the Attorney General may impose administrative penalties
for any violation of this chapter or of any conditions imposed pursuant to a
conditional approval under section 9528 of this chapter and may rescind or
deny approval for any other past, pending, or future material change
transactions involving the health care entity or an affiliate.
(3) Nothing in this subsection shall be deemed to narrow, abrogate, or
otherwise alter the authority of the Attorney General to prosecute violations of
antitrust or consumer protection requirements.
(b) Compliance monitoring. In order to effectively monitor ongoing
compliance with the terms and conditions of any transaction subject to prior
notice, approval, or conditional approval under this chapter, the Green
Mountain Care Board and the Attorney General may, in their sole discretion,
conduct a review or audit and may contract with experts and consultants to
assist in this regard.
(c) Annual reporting. Annually following the completion of the material
change transaction approved or conditionally approved by the Green Mountain
Care Board after a comprehensive review under section 9527 of this chapter,
the health care entity or other person that acquired direct or indirect control
VT LEG #378935 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.71
2025 Page 27 of 45
over the health care entity shall submit a report to the Green Mountain Care
Board and the Attorney General that:
(1) demonstrates compliance with conditions placed on the transaction,
if any;
(2) analyzes cost trends and cost growth trends of the parties to the
transaction; and
(3) analyzes any changes or effects of the transaction on patient access,
availability of services, workforce, quality, or equity.
(d) Costs. The Green Mountain Care Board and the Attorney General shall
be entitled to charge costs to the transacting parties for all actual, reasonable,
and direct costs incurred in monitoring ongoing compliance with the terms and
conditions of the sale or transfer of assets, including contractor and
administrative costs.
Subchapter 3. Prohibition on Corporate Practice of Medicine
§ 9531. CORPORATE PRACTICE OF MEDICINE PROHIBITED
(a) It is unlawful for an individual, corporation, partnership, or
any other entity without a license under 26 V.S.A. chapter 23 or 33 to own a
medical practice, employ licensees, or otherwise engage in the practice of
medicine.
(b) Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, an individual,
corporation, partnership, or any other entity without a license under 26 V.S.A.
VT LEG #378935 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.71
2025 Page 28 of 45
chapter 23 or 33 that is permitted to employ licensees under section 9532 of
this chapter shall not indirectly or directly interfere with, control, or otherwise
direct the professional judgment or clinical decisions of a licensee.
§ 9532. CORPORATE ENTITIES PERMITTED TO EMPLOY
PHYSICIANS
(a) A medical practice organized for the purpose of practicing medicine
may employ physicians and engage in the practice of medicine only if all of
the following conditions are met:
(1) Licensees who are licensed in this State to practice medicine must
hold the majority of each class of shares that are entitled to vote.
(2) Licensees who are licensed in this State to practice medicine must
comprise a majority of the directors.
(3) All officers except the secretary and treasurer, if any, must be
licensees who are licensed in this State to practice medicine. The same
individual may hold any two or more offices.
(b) Notwithstanding any provision of subsection (a) of this section to the
contrary, the following entities may employ physicians and engage in the
practice of medicine:
(1) federally qualified health centers;
(2) rural health clinics;
(3) free and referral clinics;
VT LEG #378935 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.71
2025 Page 29 of 45
(4) nonprofit hospitals;
(5) hospitals and other health care facilities owned or operated, or both,
by the State;
(6) ambulatory surgical centers; and
(7) school-based health clinics, including student health centers at
postsecondary schools.
§ 9533. REGULATION OF CONTRACTS BETWEEN MEDICAL
PRACTICES AND MANAGEMENT SERVICES
ORGANIZATIONS
(a) Prohibition on straw ownership.
(1) Each licensee owner of a medical practice shall exhibit meaningful
ownership of the medical practice.
(2) Meaningful ownership means that each licensee owner is duly
licensed and present in this State and is substantially engaged in delivering
medical care or managing the medical practice, or both.
(b) Prohibition on dual ownership or interests.
(1) Except as provided in subdivision (2) of this subsection, a
shareholder, director, or officer of a medical practice shall not do any of the
following:
(A) own or control shares in, serve as a director or officer of, be an
employee of or an independent contractor with, or otherwise participate in
VT LEG #378935 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.71
2025 Page 30 of 45
managing both the medical practice and a management services organization
with which the medical practice has a contract; or
(B) receive substantial compensation or remuneration from a
management services organization in return for ownership or management of
the medical practice.
(2) Subdivision (1) of this subsection shall not apply to the shareholders,
directors, or officers of a medical practice if the medical practice owns a
majority of the interest in the management services organization or separate
legal entity.
(c) Prohibition on stock transfer restriction agreements.
(1) A medical practice shall not transfer or relinquish control over the
sale, the restriction of the sale, or the encumbrance of the sale of the medical
practice’s shares or assets.
(2) A medical practice shall not transfer or relinquish control over the
issuing of shares of stock in the medical practice, in a subsidiary of the medical
practice or an entity affiliated with the medical practice, or the paying of
dividends.
(d) Prohibition on restrictive covenants.
(1) Noncompetition agreements.
VT LEG #378935 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.71
2025 Page 31 of 45
(A) Except as provided in subdivision (B) of this subdivision (d)(1), a
noncompetition agreement between a licensee and another person is void and
unenforceable.
(B) Notwithstanding subdivision (A) of this subdivision (d)(1), a
noncompetition agreement between a licensee and another person is valid and
enforceable if the licensee is a shareholder or member of the other person or
otherwise owns or controls an ownership or membership interest that is
equivalent to 25 percent or more of the entire ownership or membership
interest that exists in the other person.
(2) Nondisclosure and nondisparagement agreements.
(A) Except as provided in subdivision (B) of this subdivision (d)(2), a
nondisclosure agreement or nondisparagement agreement between a licensee
and a management services organization is void and unenforceable.
(B) Subdivision (A) of this subdivision (d)(2) shall not be deemed to
limit or otherwise affect any cause of action that:
(i) a party to, or third-party beneficiary of, the agreement may
have with respect to a statement of a licensee that constitutes libel, slander, a
tortious interference with contractual relations, or another tort for which the
party has a cause of action against the licensee; and
(ii) does not depend upon or derive from a breach or violation of
an agreement described in subdivision (1) of this subsection (d).
VT LEG #378935 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.71
2025 Page 32 of 45
(e) Limitations on advertising. It is unlawful for a management services
organization or other legal entity that is not the medical practice to advertise
the medical practice’s services under the name of the entity that is not the
medical practice.
(f) Prohibition on relinquishing control of medical practice.
(1) A medical practice shall not, by means of a contract or other
agreement or arrangement, by providing in the medical practice’s articles of
incorporation or bylaws, by forming a subsidiary or affiliated entity, or by
other means, relinquish control over or otherwise transfer de facto control over
any of the medical practice’s administrative, business, or clinical operations
that may affect clinical decision making or the nature or quality of medical
care that the medical practice delivers.
(2) Conduct prohibited under subdivision (1) of this subsection
includes relinquishing ultimate decision-making authority over:
(A) hiring or termination, setting work schedules and compensation,
or otherwise specifying terms of employment of employees who are licensed to
practice medicine in this State or who are licensed in this State as a physician
assistant or advanced practice registered nurse;
(B) the disbursement of revenue generated from physician fees and
other revenue generated by physician services;
VT LEG #378935 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.71
2025 Page 33 of 45
(C) collaboration and negotiation with hospitals and other health care
facilities in which the licensees of the medical practice may deliver clinical
care, including controlling licensee schedules as a means of discipline;
(D) setting staffing levels, or specifying the period of time that a
licensee may spend with a patient, for any location that serves patients;
(E) making diagnostic coding decisions;
(F) setting clinical standards or policies;
(G) setting policies for patient, client, or customer billing and
collection;
(H) setting the prices, rates, or amounts the medical practice charges
for a licensee’s services; or
(I) negotiating, executing, performing, enforcing, or terminating
contracts with third-party payers or persons who are not employees of the
medical practice.
(3) The conduct described in subdivision (2) of this subsection does not
prohibit:
(A) collection of quality metrics as required by law or in accordance
with an agreement to which the medical practice is a party; or
(B) setting criteria for reimbursement under a contract between the
medical practice and an insurer or a payer or entity that otherwise reimburses
the medical practice for providing medical care.
VT LEG #378935 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.71
2025 Page 34 of 45
(4) A medical practice may relinquish or transfer control over the
medical practice’s administrative, business, or clinical operations that will not
affect clinical decision making or the nature or quality of medical care that the
medical practice delivers, provided that the medical practice executes a
shareholder agreement exclusively between or among and for the benefit of a
majority of shareholders who are physicians licensed in this State to practice
medicine and the shareholder agreement.
§ 9534. PROTECTIONS FOR EMPLOYED LICENSEES
(a) Application. The provisions set forth in this section apply to licensees
who are employed by, or who provide health care services under contract with,
an unlicensed person, corporation, or other entity under section 9532 of this
chapter.
(b) Prohibition on restrictive covenants.
(1) Noncompetition agreements. A noncompetition agreement between
a licensee and an employer or other entity is void and unenforceable.
(2) Nondisclosure and nondisparagement agreements.
(A) Except as provided in subdivision (B) of this subdivision (b)(2), a
nondisclosure agreement or nondisparagement agreement between a licensee
and an employer or other entity is void and unenforceable.
(B) Subdivision (A) of this subdivision (b)(2) shall not be deemed to
limit or otherwise affect any cause of action that:
VT LEG #378935 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.71
2025 Page 35 of 45
(i) a party to, or third-party beneficiary of, the agreement may
have with respect to a statement of a licensee that constitutes libel, slander, a
tortious interference with contractual relations, or another tort for which the
party has a cause of action against the licensee; and
(ii) does not depend upon or derive from a breach or violation of
an agreement described in subdivision (1) of this subsection (b).
(c) Prohibition on directing licensee’s professional judgment or clinical
decisions. Conduct prohibited under subsection 9531(b) of this chapter
includes controlling, either directly or indirectly, through discipline,
punishment, threats, adverse employment actions, coercion, retaliation,
excessive pressure, or otherwise, any one or more of the following:
(1) the period of time a licensee may spend with a patient, including the
time permitted for a licensee to triage patients in the emergency department or
evaluate admitted patients;
(2) the period of time within which a licensee must discharge a patient;
(3) the clinical status of a patient, including whether the patient should
be admitted to inpatient status, whether the patient should be kept in
observation status, whether the patient should receive palliative care, and
whether and where the patient should be referred upon discharge, such as a
skilled nursing facility;
VT LEG #378935 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.71
2025 Page 36 of 45
(4) the diagnoses, diagnostic terminology, or codes that are entered into
the medical record by the licensee;
(5) the range of clinical orders available to licensees, including by
configuring the medical record to prohibit or significantly limit the options
available to the licensee; or
(6) any other action specified by rule to constitute impermissible
interference or control over the clinical judgment and decision making of a
licensee.
Subchapter 4. Transparency in Ownership and Control of Health Care Entities
§ 9541. REPORTING OF OWNERSHIP AND CONTROL OF HEALTH
CARE ENTITIES
(a) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b) of this section, each
health care entity shall report to the Green Mountain Care Board at least once
every two years and upon the consummation of a material change transaction
involving the entity, in a form and manner required by the Board, the following
information:
(1) the health care entity’s legal name;
(2) the health care entity’s business address;
(3) the locations of the health care entity’s operations;
(4) the health care entity’s business identification numbers, as
applicable, including:
VT LEG #378935 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.71
2025 Page 37 of 45
(A) taxpayer identification number (TIN);
(B) national provider identifier (NPI);
(C) employer identification number (EIN);
(D) Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services certification number
(CCN);
(E) National Association of Insurance Commissioners (NAIC)
identification number;
(F) a personal identification number associated with a license issued
by the Department of Financial Regulation; and
(G) a pharmacy benefit manager identification number associated
with a licensed issued to a pharmacy benefit manager in this State;
(5) the name and contact information of a representative of the health
care entity;
(6) the name, business address, and business identification numbers
listed in subdivision (4) of this subsection for each person who, with respect to
the relevant health care entity:
(A) has an ownership or investment interest;
(B) has a controlling interest;
(C) is a management services organization; or
(D) is a significant equity investor;
VT LEG #378935 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.71
2025 Page 38 of 45
(7) a current organizational chart showing the business structure of the
health care entity, including:
(A) any entity listed in subdivision (6) of this subsection (a);
(B) affiliates, including entities that control or are under common
control as the health care entity; and
(C) subsidiaries;
(8) for a health care entity that is a provider organization or a health care
facility:
(A) the affiliated health care providers identified by name, license
type, specialty, NPI, and other applicable identification number listed in
subdivision (4) of this subsection (a); the address of each health care provider’s
principal practice location; and whether the health care provider is employed or
contracted by the entity; and
(B) the name and address of affiliated health care facilities by license
number, license type, and capacity;
(9) the names; NPI, if applicable; and compensation of:
(A) the members of the health care entity’s governing board, board of
directors, or similar governance body;
(B) any entity that is owned or controlled by, affiliated with, or under
common control as the health care entity; and
(C) any entity listed in subdivision (6) of this subsection (a); and
VT LEG #378935 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.71
2025 Page 39 of 45
(10) comprehensive financial reports of the health care entity and any
ownership and control entities, including audited financial statements, cost
reports, annual costs, annual receipts, realized capital gains and losses,
accumulated surplus, and accumulated reserves.
(b) The following health care entities are exempt from the reporting
requirements set forth in subsection (a) of this section:
(1) a health care entity that is an independent provider organization,
without any ownership or control entities, consisting of two or fewer
physicians; provided, however, that if such health care entity experiences a
material change transaction under subchapter 2 of this chapter, the health care
entity is subject to reporting under subsection (a) of this section upon the
consummation of the transaction; and
(2) a health care provider or provider organization that is owned or
controlled by another health care entity, if the health care provider organization
is shown in the organizational chart submitted under subdivision (a)(7) of this
section and the controlling health care entity reports all the information
required under subsection (a) of this section on behalf of the controlled or
owned entity; provided, however, that health care facilities are not subject to
this exemption.
VT LEG #378935 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.71
2025 Page 40 of 45
§ 9542. SHARING OF OWNERSHIP INFORMATION TO IMPROVE
TRANSPARENCY
(a) Information provided under this section shall be public information and
shall not be considered confidential, proprietary, or a trade secret; provided,
however, that any individual health care provider’s taxpayer ID that is also the
individual’s Social Security number shall be exempt from public inspection
and copying under the Public Records Act and shall be kept confidential.
(b) On or before February 1, 2027, and every two years thereafter, the
Green Mountain Care Board shall post on its website a report with respect to
the previous two-year period, including:
(1) the number of health care entities reporting for such year,
disaggregated by the business structure of each specified entity;
(2) the names, addresses, business structure of any entities with an
ownership or controlling interest in each health care entity;
(3) any change in ownership or control for each health care entity;
(4) any change in the tax identification number of a health care entity;
(5) as applicable, the name, address, tax identification number, and
business structure of other affiliates under common control, subsidiaries, and
management services entities as the health care entity, including the business
type and the tax identification number of each; and
VT LEG #378935 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.71
2025 Page 41 of 45
(6) an analysis of trends in horizontal and vertical consolidation,
disaggregated by business structure and provider type.
(c) The Green Mountain Care Board may share information reported under
this subchapter with the Attorney General, other State agencies, and other State
officials to reduce or avoid duplication in reporting requirements or to facilitate
oversight or enforcement pursuant to the Vermont law, or both, and any tax
identification numbers that are individual Social Security numbers may be
shared with the Attorney General, other State agencies, and other State
officials who agree to maintain the confidentiality of such information. The
Board may, in consultation with the relevant State agencies, merge similar
reporting requirements where appropriate.
§ 9543. ADMINISTRATION AND ENFORCEMENT
(a)(1) The Board shall also specify the format and content of reports
required under this subchapter and impose penalties for noncompliance.
(2) Board may require additional reporting of data or information that it
determines is necessary to better protect the public’s interest in monitoring the
financial conditions, organizational structure, business practices, and market
share of each registered health care entity.
(b) The Board may assess and collect from health care entities its
reasonable costs in overseeing and implementing this subchapter.
VT LEG #378935 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.71
2025 Page 42 of 45
(c) The Board is authorized to audit and inspect the records of any health
care entity that has failed to submit complete information pursuant to this
subchapter or if the Board has reason to question the accuracy or completeness
of the information submitted pursuant this subchapter.
(d) The Board shall conduct annual audits of a random sample of health
care entities to verify compliance with, accuracy of, and completeness of the
reported information pursuant to this subchapter.
(e) If a health care entity fails to provide a complete report under section
9541 of this chapter, or submits a report containing false information, the
entity shall be subject to a civil penalty as determined by the Attorney General.
Subchapter 5. Enforcement of Chapter
§ 9547. ENFORCEMENT OF CHAPTER
(a) Enforcement by Attorney General.
(1) The Attorney General may subpoena any records necessary to
enforce any provisions of this chapter or to investigate suspected violations of
any provisions of this chapter or any conditions imposed by conditional
approval pursuant to the material transactions review process.
(2)(A) The Attorney General may enforce any requirement of this
chapter and any conditions imposed by a conditional approval pursuant to the
material transactions review process to the fullest extent provided by law,
including damages. In addition to any legal remedies the Attorney General
VT LEG #378935 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.71
2025 Page 43 of 45
may have, the Attorney General shall be entitled to specific performance,
injunctive relief, and other equitable remedies a court deems appropriate for
any violations or imminent violation of any requirement of this chapter or any
violations or breach of any of the conditions and shall be entitled to recover the
attorney’s fees and costs incurred in remedying each violation.
(B) In addition to the remedies set forth in subdivision (A) of this
subdivision (a)(2), the Attorney General may impose administrative penalties
for violations of this chapter or of any conditions imposed pursuant to a
conditional approval and may rescind or deny approval for any other past,
pending, or future material change transactions involving the health care entity
or an affiliate.
(3) Nothing in this subsection shall narrow, abrogate, or otherwise alter
the authority of the Attorney General to prosecute violations of antitrust or
consumer protection requirements.
(b) Administrative enforcement.
(1) Any entity that violates any provision of this chapter or any rules
adopted pursuant this chapter may be subject to administrative penalties
imposed by the Green Mountain Care Board.
(2) The Green Mountain Care Board may disapprove any transaction or
agreement that violates this chapter.
VT LEG #378935 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.71
2025 Page 44 of 45
(3) The Green Mountain Care Board may refer any entity to the
Attorney General to review for enforcement of any noncompliance with this
chapter or rules adopted pursuant to this chapter.
(c) Private right of action.
(1) Any person aggrieved by a violation of this chapter may bring an
action in the Civil Division of the Superior Court without exhaustion of any
alternative administrative remedies provided in this chapter.
(2) If the court finds that the respondent has intentionally violated any
provision of this chapter or any rule adopted pursuant to this chapter, it may
award actual damages, punitive damages, or other equitable relief, or a
combination of these.
§ 9548. RULEMAKING
The Green Mountain Care Board and the Attorney General, as applicable,
shall adopt rules as needed to implement the provisions of this chapter,
including establishing what:
(1) constitutes a “material” change transaction, which shall include any
changes to health care services or line of business that affects competition or
access in one or more geographic regions of the State;
(2) it means to acquire direct or indirect control over a health care entity
in whole or in substantial part;
VT LEG #378935 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.71
2025 Page 45 of 45
(3) constitutes a “significant reduction” and “essential health services”;
and
(4) information is required for notice of a material change transaction
pursuant to section 9525 of this chapter.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #378935 v.2